Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 4. Acquisitions of Control, Mergers, Purchases, and Sales.

Sec. 10.13.400.
Acquiring control of a licensee.

A person may not acquire control of a licensee without the prior approval of the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.410.
Application to acquire control.

The department shall approve an application to acquire control of a licensee under AS

10.13.400

if the department determines that

the applicant and the directors and officers of the applicant are of good character and sound financial standing;

it is reasonable to believe that the applicant will comply with this chapter; and

the plans, if any, of the applicant to make a major change in the business, corporate structure, or management of the licensee are not detrimental to the safety and soundness of the licensee.

If, after notice and a hearing, the department determines that the criteria for approval in (a) of this section have not been satisfied, the department shall deny the application.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.420.
Determinations.

When the department is reviewing an application under AS

10.13.410

, the department may determine that an

applicant or a director or officer of an applicant is not of good character if the person has been convicted of a crime involving fraud or dishonesty, including a conviction based on a guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere;

applicant’s plan to make a major change in the management of a licensee is detrimental to the safety and soundness of the licensee if the plan provides for a person to become a director or officer of the licensee and the person has been convicted of a crime involving fraud or dishonesty, including a conviction based on a guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere.

The conditions described in (a) of this section are not the only conditions upon which the department may determine that an applicant or a director or an officer of an applicant is not of good character or that an applicant’s plan to make a major change in the management of a licensee is detrimental to the safety and soundness of the licensee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.430.
Merger.

A licensee may not merge with another corporation unless the merger is approved by the department, and, if the licensee is not the surviving corporation, the surviving corporation is a licensee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.440.
Purchase.

A licensee may not purchase all or substantially all of the business of another person unless the purchase is approved by the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.450.
Sale.

A licensee may not sell all or substantially all of the licensee’s business or of the business of an office of the licensee to another person unless the purchaser is a licensee and the sale is approved by the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.460.
Department approval.

The department may not approve a merger, purchase, or sale under AS

10.13.430

—

10.13.450

unless the department determines that

the merger, purchase, or sale will be safe and sound with respect to the acquiring licensee;

upon consummation of the merger, purchase, or sale, it is reasonable to believe that the acquiring licensee will comply with this chapter;

the merger, purchase, or sale will not have a major detrimental effect on competition in the providing of financial assistance or management assistance to businesses, or, if there will be a detrimental effect, the merger, purchase, or sale is necessary in the interests of the safety and soundness of a party to the merger, purchase, or sale, or is otherwise, on balance, in the public interest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)